en: Without sodium lauryl sulfates
de: Ohne Natriumlaurylsulfate
es: Sin sulfatos de sodio laurilo
fr: Sans sodium lauryl sulfates
it: Senza solfati di sodio laurilico
nl: Zonder natriumlaurylsulfaten
pt: Sem sulfatos de sódio laurílico

en: Without alkaline soap
de: Ohne alkalische Seife
es: Sin jabón alcalino
fr: Sans savon alcalin
it: Senza sapone alcalino
ja: アルカリ性石鹸不使用
ko: 알칼리성 비누 없음
nl: Zonder alkalische zeep
pt: Sem sabão alcalino

en: Without soap
ar: بدون صابون
az: Sabunsuz
bg: Без сапун
bn: সাবান ছাড়া
cs: Bez mýdla
da: Uden sæbe
de: Ohne Seife
el: Χωρίς σαπούνι
es: Sin jabón
et: Seebivaba
fa: بدون صابون
fi: Ilman saippuaa
fr: Sans savon
ga: Gan gallúnach
gu: સાબુ વગર
he: ללא סבון
hr: Bez sapuna
hu: Szappan nélkül
id: Tanpa sabun
is: Án sápu
it: Senza sapone
ja: 石鹸不使用
ka: საპნის გარეშე
kk: Сабынсыз
km: គ្មានសាប៊ូ
kn: ಸೋಪು ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 비누 없음
ky: Самынсыз
lt: Be muilo
lv: Bez ziepēm
ml: സോപ്പ് ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Савангүй
mr: साबणाशिवाय
ms: Tanpa sabun
mt: Mingħajr sapun
ne: साबुन बिना
nl: Zonder zeep
no: Uten såpe
or: ସାବୁନ ବିନା
pa: ਸਾਬਣ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez mydła
pt: Sem sabão
ro: Fără săpun
ru: Без мыла
si: සබන් රහිත
sk: Bez mydla
sl: Brez mila
sq: Pa sapun
sr: Bez sapuna
sv: Utan tvål
sw: Bila sabuni
ta: சோப்பு இல்லாமல்
te: సబ్బు లేకుండా
tg: Бе собун
th: ไม่มีสบู่
tk: Sabynsyz
tl: Walang sabon
tr: Sabunsuz
uk: Без мила
uz: Sovunsiz
vi: Không xà phòng

en: Without resorcinol
de: Ohne Resorcin
es: Sin resorcinol
fr: Sans resorcine
it: Senza resorcinolo
ja: レゾルシノール不使用
ko: 레조르시놀 없음
nl: Zonder resorcinol
pt: Sem resorcinol

en: Without synthetic antiperspirant
fr: Sans anti transpirant synthetique

en: Without picramic acid
de: Ohne Pikraminsäure
es: Sin ácido picrámico
fr: Sans acide picramique
it: Senza acido picramico
ja: ピクラミン酸不使用
ko: 피크람산 없음
nl: Zonder picraminezuur
pt: Sem ácido pícrico

en: Without SLS SLES
fr: Sans SLS SLES

en: Without metallic salts
ar: بدون أملاح معدنية
az: Metal duzları olmadan
bg: Без метални соли
bn: ধাতব লবণ ছাড়া
cs: Bez kovových solí
da: Uden metalsalte
de: Ohne Metallsalze
el: Χωρίς μεταλλικά άλατα
es: Sin sales metálicas
et: Ilma metallisooladeta
fa: بدون نمک های فلزی
fi: Ilman metallisuoloja
fr: Sans sels metalliques
ga: Gan salainn mhiotalacha
gu: ધાતુના ક્ષાર વગર
he: ללא מלחי מתכת
hr: Bez metalnih soli
hu: Fém sók nélkül
id: Tanpa garam logam
is: Án málmsalta
it: Senza sali metallici
ja: 金属塩不使用
ka: ლითონის მარილების გარეშე
kk: Металл тұздарынсыз
km: គ្មានអំបិលលោហធាតុ
kn: ಲೋಹೀಯ ಲವಣಗಳಿಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 금속염 없음
ky: Металл туздары жок
lt: Be metalo druskų
lv: Bez metālu sāļiem
ml: ലോഹ ലവണങ്ങൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Металлын давсгүй
mr: धातूच्या क्षारांशिवाय
ms: Tanpa garam logam
mt: Mingħajr imluħa metalliċi
ne: धातुको नुन बिना
nl: Zonder metaalzouten
no: Uten metallsalter
or: ଧାତବ ଲବଣ ବିନା
pa: ਧਾਤੂ ਲੂਣ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez soli metali
pt: Sem sais metálicos
ro: Fără săruri metalice
ru: Без металлических солей
si: ලෝහ ලවණ රහිත
sk: Bez kovových solí
sl: Brez kovinskih soli
sq: Pa kripëra metalike
sr: Bez metalnih soli
sv: Utan metallsalter
sw: Bila chumvi za metali
ta: உலோக உப்புகள் இல்லாமல்
te: లోహ లవణాలు లేకుండా
tg: Бе намакҳои металлӣ
th: ไม่มีเกลือโลหะ
tk: Metal duzlary bolmazdan
tl: Walang mga metal na asing-gamot
tr: Metal tuzları olmadan
uk: Без металевих солей
uz: Metall tuzlarisiz
vi: Không chứa muối kim loại

en: Without peroxides
bg: Без пероксиди
cs: Bez peroxidů
da: Uden peroxider
de: Ohne Peroxide
el: Χωρίς υπεροξείδια
es: Sin peróxidos
et: Ilma peroksiidideta
fi: Ilman peroksideja
fr: Sans peroxydes, sans peroxyde, sans peroxide d'hydrogene

en: Without chlorine bleaching
ar: بدون تبييض الكلور
az: Xlor ağartma olmadan
bg: Без хлорна белина
bn: ক্লোরিন ব্লিচিং ছাড়া
cs: Bez chlórového bělení
da: Uden klorblegning
de: Ohne Chlorbleiche
el: Χωρίς λεύκανση με χλώριο
es: Sin blanqueamiento con cloro
et: Ilma kloorvalgendamiseta
fa: بدون سفید کننده کلر
fi: Ilman kloorivalkaisua
fr: Sans blanchissement au chlore
ga: Gan tuaradh clóirín
gu: ક્લોરિન બ્લીચિંગ વગર
he: ללא הלבנת כלור
hr: Bez izbjeljivanja klorom
hu: Klórmentesítés nélkül
id: Tanpa pemutihan klorin
is: Án klórbleikingar
it: Senza candeggio al cloro
ja: 塩素漂白なし
ka: ქლორის გაუფერულების გარეშე
kk: Хлорлы ағартқышсыз
km: គ្មានសារធាតុ bleach ក្លរីន
kn: ಕ್ಲೋರಿನ್ ಬ್ಲೀಚಿಂಗ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 염소 표백 없이
ky: Хлорсуз агартуу
lt: Be chloro baliklio
lv: Bez hlora balināšanas
ml: ക്ലോറിൻ ബ്ലീച്ചിംഗ് ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Хлоргүй цайруулалт
mr: क्लोरीन ब्लीचिंगशिवाय
ms: Tanpa pelunturan klorin
mt: Mingħajr bliċ tal-klorin
ne: क्लोरीन ब्लीच बिना
nl: Zonder chloorbleekmiddel
no: Uten klorbleking
or: କ୍ଲୋରିନ୍ ବ୍ଲିଚିଂ ବିନା
pa: ਕਲੋਰੀਨ ਬਲੀਚਿੰਗ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez wybielania chlorem
pt: Sem branqueamento com cloro
ro: Fără albire cu clor
ru: Без хлорного отбеливания
si: ක්ලෝරීන් විරංජනයකින් තොරව
sk: Bez chlórového bielenia
sl: Brez beljenja s klorom
sq: Pa zbardhues klori
sr: Bez izbeljivanja hlorom
sv: Utan klorblekning
sw: Bila bleach ya klorini
ta: குளோரின் ப்ளீச்சிங் இல்லாமல்
te: క్లోరిన్ బ్లీచింగ్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе сафедкунии хлор
th: ไม่มีสารฟอกขาวคลอรีน
tk: Hlorsyz agartma
tl: Walang chlorine bleaching
tr: Klorlu ağartma olmadan
uk: Без хлорного відбілювання
uz: Xlorsiz oqartirish
vi: Không tẩy trắng bằng clo

en: Without water, Waterfree
fr: Sans eau
sv: Utan vatten, Vattenfri

en: With glycerine, With glycerin
fr: Avec glycérine
sv: Med glycerin

en: With rapeseed oil
fr: Avec de l'huile de colza
sv: Med rapsolja

en: With vitamin E
fr: Avec vitamine E
sv: Med vitamin E

en: With Q10
fr: Avec Q10
sv: Med Q10

en: With fluoride
fi: Lisätty fluoria
fr: Avec fluor
sv: Med fluorid

en: Low foam
fi: Vähän vaahtoava
fr: Peu moussant
sv: Lätt skummande

en: Caries preventive
fi: Ennaltaehkäisee kariesta
fr: Prévention des caries, prévient les caries
sv: Kariesförebyggande

en: Developed by dental experts
fr: Développé par des experts dentaires

en: Developed in collaboration with dental experts
fr: Développé en collaboration avec des experts dentaires